Utah statutes.
63G-6-104.   Application of chapter.
(1)  This chapter applies only to contracts solicited or entered into after
the effective date of this chapter unless the parties agree to its application
to a contract solicited or entered into prior to the effective date.
(2)  Except as provided in Section 63G-6-105, this chapter shall apply to
every expenditure of public funds irrespective of their source, including
federal assistance, by any state agency under any contract.
(3) (a)  Only the following sections shall apply to local public procurement
units: Sections 63G-6-103, 63G-6-105, 63G-6-301, 63G-6-303 through 63G-6-420,
63G-6-422, 63G-6-501 through 63G-6-602, 63G-6-801 through 63G-6-806, and
63G-6-815 through 63G-6-819; provided, however, that, except as provided in
Sections 63G-6-906 and 63G-6-907, the jurisdiction of the procurement appeals
board is limited to matters involving state agencies.
(b)  Subsections 63G-6-208(1)(b), 63G-6-504(4), and 63G-6-505(2) also apply to
local public procurement units.
(c)  For the purpose of application of those sections and subsections to a
local public procurement unit, "state" shall mean "local public procurement
unit," "chief procurement officer" or "head of a purchasing agency" shall mean
any person conducting procurement for a local public procurement unit, and
"rules and regulations" shall mean ordinances and rules and regulations
promulgated by a local public procurement unit to implement or supplement
those sections.
(d)  In addition to the sections and subsections listed above and except as
provided in Subsection 17B-1-108(3) relating to local districts, each local
public procurement unit shall adopt ordinances relating to the procurement of
architect-engineer services not inconsistent with the provisions of Part 7,
Architect-Engineer Services.
(e)  Any other section of this chapter, or its implementing regulations, may
be adopted by any local public procurement unit.
(f)  Any other implementing regulations adopted by local public procurement
units may not be inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter.
(4)  Unless otherwise provided by statute, this chapter does not apply to
procurement of real property.
